Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 214.10, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Board of Architecture, Engineering, Land Surveying, Landscape Architecture, Geoscience, and Interior Design. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 13.41 or other applicable law, in the case of a complaint to the Board of Architecture, Engineering, Land Surveying, Landscape Architecture, Geoscience, and Interior Design initiated or submitted by the executive director of that board, the fact that the complaint was initiated or submitted by the executive director is public data and must be affirmatively disclosed to the board and to the subject of the complaint. Any documents provided to the board related to the complaint must also be provided to the person who is the subject of the complaint. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to complaints submitted or initiated on or after that date. new text end